Connecticut, session 2026, SB00408.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 30-39 of the 2026
2 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (b) (1) Any person desiring a liquor permit or a renewal of such a
5 permit shall make an affirmed application therefor to the Department of
6 Consumer Protection, upon forms to be furnished by the department,
7 showing the name and address of the applicant and of the applicant's
8 backer, if any, the location of the club or place of business which is to be
9 operated under such permit and a financial statement setting forth all
10 elements and details of any business transactions connected with the
11 application. Such application shall include a detailed description of the
12 type of live entertainment that is to be provided. A club or place of
13 business shall be exempt from providing such detailed description if the
14 club or place of business (A) was issued a liquor permit prior to October
15 1, 1993, and (B) has not altered the type of entertainment provided. The
16 application shall also indicate any crimes of which the applicant or the
17 applicant's backer may have been convicted. The department shall not
18 review an initial application until the applicant has submitted all
LCO 1 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
19 documents necessary to establish that state and local building, fire and
20 zoning requirements and local ordinances concerning hours and days
21 of sale will be met, except that local building and zoning requirements
22 and local ordinances concerning hours and days of sale shall not apply
23 to a cafe permit issued under subsection (d) or (h) of section 30-22a. If
24 the applicant does not submit all such documents within the thirty-day
25 period beginning on the date on which the department receives the
26 initial application, or if such documents are not fully executed by the
27 appropriate authorities, such initial application shall be deemed
28 withdrawn and invalid. The State Fire Marshal or the marshal's certified
29 designee shall be responsible for approving compliance with the State
30 Fire Code at Bradley International Airport. Any person desiring a
31 permit provided for in section 30-33b shall file a copy of such person's
32 license with such application if such license was issued by the
33 Department of Consumer Protection. The department may, at its
34 discretion, conduct an investigation to determine (i) whether a permit
35 shall be issued to an applicant or the applicant's backer, or (ii) the
36 suitability of the proposed permit premises. Completion of an
37 inspection pursuant to subsection (f) of section 29-305, as amended by
38 this act, shall not be deemed to constitute a precondition to renewal of a
39 permit that is subject to subsection (f) of section 29-305, as amended by
40 this act, but each applicant for the renewal of such permit shall certify
41 on the renewal application that such inspection has occurred or will
42 occur within the calendar year.
43 Sec. 2. Section 29-305 of the general statutes is repealed and the
44 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
45 (a) Each local fire marshal and the State Fire Marshal, for the purpose
46 of satisfying themselves that all pertinent statutes and regulations are
47 complied with, may inspect in the interests of public safety all buildings,
48 facilities, processes, equipment, systems and other areas regulated by
49 the Fire Safety Code and the State Fire Prevention Code within their
50 respective jurisdictions.
51 (b) Each local fire marshal shall inspect, or cause to be inspected by a
LCO 2 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
52 member of the local fire department or a qualified third party
53 designated by the local fire marshal, at least once [each] every two
54 calendar [year] years or as often as prescribed by the State Fire Marshal
55 pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, in the interests of public safety,
56 all buildings and facilities of public service and all occupancies
57 regulated by the Fire Safety Code or State Fire Prevention Code within
58 the local fire marshal's jurisdiction, except residential buildings
59 designed to be occupied by one or two families which shall be inspected,
60 upon complaint or request of an owner or occupant, only for the
61 purpose of determining whether the requirements specified in said
62 codes relative to smoke detection and warning equipment have been
63 satisfied. In the case of a school building, each local fire marshal shall
64 submit a written report to the local or regional board of education
65 documenting each such inspection.
66 (c) Upon receipt by the State Fire Marshal of information from an
67 authentic source that any other building or facility within the State Fire
68 Marshal's jurisdiction is hazardous to life safety from fire, the State Fire
69 Marshal shall inspect such building or facility.
70 (d) Upon receipt by the local fire marshal of information from an
71 authentic source that any other building or facility within the local fire
72 marshal's jurisdiction is hazardous to life safety from fire, the local fire
73 marshal shall inspect such building or facility or cause such building or
74 facility to be inspected by a member of the local fire department or a
75 qualified third party designated by the local fire marshal. In each case
76 in which the local fire marshal or designee conducts an inspection, the
77 local fire marshal or designee shall be satisfied that all pertinent statutes
78 and regulations are complied with, and shall keep a record of such
79 investigations. Such local fire marshal or [a] designee shall have the
80 right of entry at all reasonable hours into or upon any premises within
81 the local fire marshal's jurisdiction for the performance of the fire
82 marshal's duties except that occupied dwellings and habitations,
83 exclusive of common use passageways and rooms in tenement houses,
84 hotels and rooming houses, may only be entered for inspections
85 between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m., except in the event of any
LCO 3 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
86 emergency requiring immediate attention for life safety, or in the
87 interests of public safety. Each local fire marshal shall make a monthly
88 report to the authority which appointed the local fire marshal and shall
89 be paid for such local fire marshal's services in making such inspections
90 of buildings, facilities, processes, equipment, systems and other areas,
91 in accordance with the compensation agreed upon with such appointing
92 authority.
93 (e) The State Fire Marshal may adopt amendments to the Fire Safety
94 Code and the State Fire Prevention Code regarding requirements for the
95 frequency of inspections of different building uses regulated by the
96 codes and set forth a schedule of inspections [, except for inspections of
97 residential buildings designed to be occupied by three or more families,]
98 that are less frequent than [yearly] once every two calendar years if the
99 interests of public safety can be met by less frequent inspections.
100 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) to (e), inclusive,
101 of this section, a local fire marshal, deputy fire marshal, fire inspector or
102 other fire code inspector or fire investigator holding office in a
103 municipality shall, at least once per calendar year, inspect all premises
104 that are (1) located in the municipality, and (2) operating under a permit
105 issued pursuant to chapter 545 that allows for on-premises consumption
106 of alcoholic liquor.
107 Sec. 3. Section 47a-6a of the general statutes is repealed and the
108 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
109 (a) As used in this section: [,]
110 (1) ["address"] "Address" means a location as described by the full
111 street number, if any, the street name, the city or town, and the state,
112 and not a mailing address such as a post office box; [,]
113 (2) ["dwelling unit"] "Dwelling unit" means any house or building, or
114 portion thereof, which is rented, leased or hired out to be occupied, or
115 is arranged or designed to be occupied, or is occupied, as the home or
116 residence of one or more persons, living independently of each other,
LCO 4 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
117 and doing their cooking upon the premises, and having a common right
118 in the halls, stairways or yards; [,]
119 (3) ["agent in charge"] "Agent in charge" or "agent" means [one] an
120 individual who manages real [estate] property, including, but not
121 limited to, the collection of rents and supervision and maintenance of
122 such property, including for the purpose of compliance with state law
123 and local codes;
124 (4) ["controlling participant"] "Controlling participant" means an
125 individual [that] who exercises day-to-day financial or operational
126 control; [, and]
127 (5) ["project-based housing provider"] "Project-based housing
128 provider" means a property owner who contracts with the United States
129 Department of Housing and Urban Development to provide housing to
130 tenants under the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, 42 USC
131 1437f(o);
132 (6) "Identifying information" means proof of an individual's name,
133 date of birth, current residential address, motor vehicle operator's
134 license number or other identification number issued by any
135 government agency or entity;
136 (7) "Nonresident owner" means an individual, corporation,
137 partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity who does not reside
138 at rental real property and who is (A) an owner, as defined in section
139 47a-1, of such real property, or (B) the controlling participant of the
140 entity that owns such real property; and
141 (8) "Population" means the number of persons according to the most
142 recent federal decennial census.
143 (b) Any municipality with a population of twenty thousand or more
144 shall, and any municipality with a population of less than twenty
145 thousand may, require the nonresident owner or project-based housing
146 provider of occupied or vacant rental real property to report to the tax
LCO 5 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
147 assessor, or other municipal [office] officer designated by the
148 municipality, the current residential address of the nonresident owner
149 or project-based housing provider of such property, if the nonresident
150 owner or project-based housing provider is an individual, or the current
151 residential address of the agent in charge of the building, if the
152 nonresident owner or project-based housing provider is a corporation,
153 partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity owning rental real
154 property in the state. If the nonresident [owners] owner or project-based
155 housing [providers are] provider is a corporation, partnership, trust or
156 other legally recognized entity owning rental real property in the state,
157 such report shall also include identifying information and the current
158 residential address of each controlling participant associated with the
159 property. If such residential address changes, notice of the new
160 residential address shall be provided by such nonresident owner,
161 project-based housing provider or agent in charge of the building to the
162 office of the tax assessor or other designated municipal office not more
163 than twenty-one days after the date that the address change occurred. If
164 the nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent fails to
165 file an address under this section, the address to which the municipality
166 mails property tax bills for the rental real property shall be deemed to
167 be the nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent's
168 current address. Such address may be used for compliance with the
169 provisions of subsection [(c)] (d) of this section.
170 (c) In addition to the residential address required pursuant to
171 subsection (b) of this section, any municipality with a population of
172 twenty thousand or more shall require the nonresident owner, project-
173 based housing provider or agent in charge, as applicable, to report to
174 the tax assessor, or other municipal officer designated by the
175 municipality, (1) accurate identifying information concerning such
176 nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent in charge,
177 and (2) at least two telephone numbers that are accessible on a twenty-
178 four-hour basis for emergency response purposes.
179 [(c)] (d) Service of state or municipal orders relating to maintenance
180 of such rental real property or compliance with state law and local codes
LCO 6 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
181 concerning such real property directed to the nonresident owner,
182 project-based housing provider or agent at the address on file, or
183 deemed to be on file in accordance with the provisions of this section,
184 shall be sufficient proof of service of notice of such orders in any
185 subsequent criminal or civil action against the owner, project-based
186 housing provider or agent for failure to comply with the orders. The
187 provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the validity of
188 any other means of giving notice of such orders that may be used by the
189 state or [such] a municipality.
190 [(d)] (e) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall
191 have committed [an infraction] a violation and shall be fined not less
192 than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars.
193 [(e)] (f) Any report provided to a tax assessor pursuant to subsection
194 (b) or (c) of this section [on or after October 1, 2023,] shall be confidential
195 and shall not be disclosed under chapter 14.
196 Sec. 4. Section 30-22c of the general statutes is repealed and the
197 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
198 (a) As used in this section:
199 (1) "Juice bar or similar facility" means an area within permit premises
200 in which nonalcoholic beverages are served to minors; and
201 (2) "Permit premises" means the premises operated under (A) a cafe
202 permit issued under subsection (c) of section 30-22a, or (B) a cafe permit
203 for wine, beer and cider issued under section 30-22g.
204 (b) The holder of a cafe permit issued under subsection (c) of section
205 30-22a or a cafe permit for wine, beer and cider issued under section 30-
206 22g may operate a juice bar or similar facility at permit premises if the
207 juice bar or similar facility is limited to a room or rooms or separate area
208 within the permit premises wherein there is no sale, consumption,
209 dispensing or presence of alcoholic liquor. The holder of a cafe permit,
210 at all times when a portion of the permit premises is being operated as
LCO 7 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
211 a juice bar, shall limit the number of patrons in the portion of the permit
212 premises being operated as a juice bar to no more than ten per cent of
213 the total building occupant load established by the Fire Marshal under
214 the Fire Safety Code.
215 (c) (1) Any town may provide by ordinance the hours during which
216 a juice bar may operate, but in no event shall a juice bar be permitted to
217 operate as such after ten o'clock p.m.
218 [(c)] (2) The holder of a cafe permit issued under subsection (c) of
219 section 30-22a or a cafe permit for wine, beer and cider issued under
220 section 30-22g shall provide advance written notice to the chief law
221 enforcement officer of the town in which the permit premises is located
222 of the specific dates and hours of any scheduled event at which such
223 permit premises, or any portion thereof, will be used to operate a juice
224 bar or similar facility. Such notice shall be sent [(1)] (A) by certified mail,
225 or by electronic mail to the designated electronic mail address for the
226 chief law enforcement officer, and [(2)] (B) in a manner so that such
227 notice is received by such chief law enforcement officer not less than five
228 days, and not more than thirty days, prior to the date of such scheduled
229 event. The chief law enforcement officer of the town in which such
230 permit premises is located may designate one or more law enforcement
231 officers to attend any such scheduled event at the cost of such permit
232 holder. If, at any time prior to or during such scheduled event, the chief
233 law enforcement officer of the town, or such officer's designee,
234 determines that there is insufficient police capacity to properly and
235 safely monitor the event or enforce any applicable law related to such
236 scheduled event or the permit premises or that the event may, or has,
237 become a danger to public safety, such officer or designee may, in such
238 officer's or designee's sole discretion, reject such scheduled event or
239 order such scheduled event to be terminated.
240 (d) Nothing in this section shall exempt the holder of a cafe permit
241 issued under subsection (c) of section 30-22a or a cafe permit for wine,
242 beer and cider issued under section 30-22g from compliance with any
243 other provisions of the general statutes or regulations of Connecticut
LCO 8 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
244 state agencies concerning minors, including, but not limited to, the
245 prohibition against the sale of alcoholic liquor to minors. The presence
246 of alcoholic liquor or the sale or dispensing to or consumption of
247 alcoholic liquor by a minor at a juice bar or similar facility is prohibited.
248 (e) (1) A permittee or agent or employee of a permittee who operates
249 a juice bar or similar facility at a permit premises may serve alcoholic
250 liquor during the hours of operation of such juice bar or similar facility
251 only to a person who is twenty-one years of age or older and who is
252 wearing a conspicuous wristband that has been issued to the person
253 wearing it by the permittee or agent or employee of the permittee to
254 indicate that the permittee or agent or employee of the permittee has
255 verified that such person is twenty-one years of age or older.
256 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, any town or
257 municipality may, by ordinance, prohibit the sale of alcoholic liquor on
258 any permit premises while a juice bar is in operation.
259 (f) (1) Any permittee or agent or employee of a permittee convicted
260 of a violation of any provision of this section shall [(1)] (A) (i) for a first
261 offense, be fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars, [(B)]
262 (ii) for a second offense, be fined not more than five thousand dollars,
263 and [(C)] (iii) for a third or subsequent offense, be fined not more than
264 ten thousand dollars, or [(2)] (B) be imprisoned not more than one year
265 for a first, second, third or subsequent offense, or [(3)] (C) be both fined
266 and imprisoned.
267 (2) Any permittee who is convicted of a violation of any provision of
268 this section shall immediately report such conviction to the Liquor
269 Control Commission, which may suspend such permittee's permit on
270 the basis of the conviction.
271 (g) Any town or municipality may, by ordinance, prohibit the
272 operation of juice bars within the town or municipality.
LCO 9 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 408
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 30-39(b)(1)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 29-305
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 47a-6a
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 30-22c
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Sections 2(b) and 2(d), "sworn member" was changed to "member" for
accuracy, in Section 3(b), "and any municipality may" was changed to
"and any municipality with a population of less than twenty thousand
may" for clarity and in Section 4, "The holder of a cafe permit, at all times
when a portion of the permit premises is being operated as a juice bar,
shall limit the number of patrons in the portion of the permit premises
being operated as a juice bar to no more than ten per cent of the total
building occupant load established by the Fire Marshal under the Fire
Safety Code." was moved from Subsec. (c)(2) to Subsec. (b) for clarity.
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 10 of 10